Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 39. Relocation Assistance

§ 43-39-1.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Relocation Assistance Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-71; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-39-3.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a uniform policy for the fair and equitable treatment of persons displaced by the acquisition of real property by state and local land acquisition programs which are publicly funded in whole or in part. The policy shall be uniform as to (a) relocation payments, (b) advisory assistance, and (c) assurance of availability of standard housing under state or local land acquisition programs which are publicly funded in whole or in part.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-71; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1996).

§ 43-39-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” means any department, agency or instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, or any department, agency or instrumentality of two (2) or more political subdivisions of the state, or any person who has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under the laws of this state, that implements a project financed in whole or in part by public funds.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, or association.

“Displaced person” means, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (c), any person who moves from real property, or moves his personal property from real property, as a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire or the acquisition of other real property in whole or in part for a program or project undertaken by an agency with public financial assistance; or real property on which such person is a residential tenant or conducts a small business, a farm operation or a business as defined in this section, as a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition or such other displacing activity as the displacing agency may prescribe, under a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency with public financial assistance in any case in which the head of the displacing agency determines that such displacement is permanent; and solely for the purposes of Sections 43-39-7 and 43-39-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, any person who moves from real property or moves his personal property from real property as a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire or the acquisition of other real property, in whole or in part, on which such person conducts a business or farm operation, for a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency with public financial assistance; or as a result of rehabilitation, demolition or such other displacing activity as the displacing agency may prescribe, of other real property on which such person conducts a business or a farm operation, under a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency with public financial assistance where the displacing agency determines that such displacement is permanent. In the case of a partial acquisition, the displacing agency shall make the determination whether the person is displaced.

The term “displaced person” does not include a person who has been determined, according to criteria established by the head of the agency, to be either in unlawful occupancy of the displacement dwelling or to have occupied such dwelling for the purpose of obtaining assistance under this title, nor, in any case in which the displacing agency acquired property for a program or project, any person (other than a person who was an occupant of such property at the time it was acquired) who occupies such property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project.

“Business” means any lawful activity, excepting a farm operation, conducted primarily:

For the purchase, sale, lease and rental of personal and real property, and for the manufacture, processing or marketing of products, commodities or any other personal property;

For the sale of services to the public;

By a nonprofit organization; or

For the purposes of subsection (1) of Section 43-39-7, for assisting in the purchase, sale, resale, manufacture, processing or marketing of products, commodities, personal property or services by the erection and maintenance of an outdoor advertising display or displays, whether or not such display or displays are located on the premises on which any of the above activities are conducted.

“Farm operation” means any activity conducted solely or primarily for the production of one or more agricultural products or commodities, including timber, for sale or home use, and customarily producing such products or commodities in sufficient quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator’s support.

“Comparable replacement dwelling” means any dwelling that is decent, safe and sanitary; adequate in size to accommodate the occupants; within the financial means of the displaced person; functionally equivalent; in an area not subject to unreasonable, adverse, environmental conditions; and in a location generally not less desirable than the location of the displaced person’s dwelling with respect to public utilities, facilities, services and the displaced person’s place of employment.

“Displacing agency” means the state, a state agency or an authorized political subdivision, or any person carrying out a program or project with public financial assistance which causes a person to be a displaced person.

“Appraisal” means a written statement independently and impartially prepared by a qualified appraiser setting forth an opinion of defined value of an adequately described property as of a specific date, supported by the presentation and analysis of relevant market information.

“Lead agency” means the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-72; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1996).

§ 43-39-7.
Relocation payments; moving expense and dislocation allowances; fixed payments.

If a displacing agency acquires real property for public use, it shall make fair and reasonable relocation payments to displaced persons and businesses as required by this chapter for:

Actual reasonable expenses in moving himself, his family, business, farm operation or other personal property;

Actual direct losses of tangible personal property as a result of moving or discontinuing a business or farm operation, but not to exceed an amount equal to the reasonable expenses that would have been required to relocate such property, as determined by the agency;

Actual reasonable expenses in searching for a replacement business or farm; and

Actual reasonable expenses necessary to reestablish a displaced farm, nonprofit organization or small business at its new site in accordance with criteria to be established by the displacing agency, but not to exceed the maximum amount of relocation payments established by applicable federal regulations.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (1) of this section who is displaced from a dwelling and who elects to accept the payments authorized by this subsection in lieu of the payments authorized by subsection (1) of this section may receive an expense and dislocation allowance which shall be determined according to a schedule established by the displacing agency.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (1) of this section, who is displaced from his place of business or from his farm operation and who is eligible under criteria established by the displacing agency may also qualify for the payment authorized by this subsection. Such payment shall consist of a fixed payment in an amount to be determined by the agency, except that such payment shall not be less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than the maximum amount of relocation payments established by applicable federal regulations. A person whose sole business at the displacement dwelling is the rental of such property to others shall not qualify for a payment under this subsection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-73; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 468, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 2013.).

§ 43-39-9.
Additional payments; elements thereof; eligibility therefor.

In addition to payments otherwise authorized by this chapter, such displacing agency shall make an additional payment not in excess of the maximum amount of relocation payments established by applicable federal regulations to any displaced person who is displaced from a dwelling actually owned and occupied by the displaced person for not less than ninety (90) days before the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the property. The additional payment shall include the following elements:

The amount, if any, which when added to the acquisition cost of the dwelling acquired, equals the reasonable cost of a comparable replacement dwelling which is a decent, safe and sanitary dwelling adequate to accommodate such displaced person, reasonably accessible to public services and places of employment, and available on the private market. All determinations required to carry out this paragraph shall be determined by regulations issued pursuant to Section 43-39-17;

The amount, if any, which will compensate the displaced person for any increased interest costs and other debt service costs which the person is required to pay for financing the acquisition of any such comparable replacement dwelling. The amount shall be paid only if the dwelling acquired by the displacing agency was encumbered by a bona fide mortgage which was a valid lien on the dwelling for not less than ninety (90) days before the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the dwelling. Payment determinations shall be in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to Section 43-39-17; and

Reasonable expenses incurred by the displaced person for evidence of title, recording fees and other closing costs incident to the purchase of the replacement dwelling, but not including prepaid expenses.

The additional payment authorized by this section shall be made only to a displaced person who purchases and occupies a decent, safe and sanitary replacement dwelling within one (1) year after the date on which he receives final payment from the displacing agency for the acquired dwelling, or the date on which the displacing agency’s obligation under Section 43-39-13, is met, whichever is the later date, except that the displacing agency may extend such period for good cause. If such period is extended, the payment under this section shall be based on the costs of relocating the person to a comparable replacement dwelling within one (1) year of such date.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-74; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 4; Laws, 1980, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 468, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 2013.).

§ 43-39-11.
Additional payments to person not eligible under § 43-39-9.

In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this chapter, the head of a displacing agency shall make a payment to or for any displaced person displaced from any dwelling not eligible to receive a payment under Section 43-39-9, which dwelling was actually and lawfully occupied by the displaced person for not less than ninety (90) days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations for acquisition of such dwelling, or in any case in which displacement is not a direct result of acquisition, such other event as the head of the agency shall prescribe. Such payment shall consist of the amount necessary to enable such person to lease or rent for a period not to exceed forty-two (42) months, a comparable replacement dwelling, but not to exceed the maximum amount of relocation payments established by applicable federal regulations. At the discretion of the head of the displacing agency, a payment under this subsection may be made in periodic installments. Computation of a payment under this subsection to a low-income displaced person for a comparable replacement dwelling shall take into account such person’s income.

Any person eligible for a payment under subsection (1) of this section may elect to apply such payment to a down payment on, and other incidental expenses pursuant to, the purchase of a decent, safe and sanitary replacement dwelling. Any such person may, at the discretion of the head of the displacing agency, be eligible under this subsection for the maximum payment allowed under subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-75; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 5; Laws, 2013, ch. 468, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 2013.).

§ 43-39-12.
Illegal aliens ineligible to receive relocation assistance; exception for extremely unusual hardship; adoption of rules and regulations.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a displaced person shall not be eligible to receive relocation payments or any other assistance under this chapter if the displaced person is an alien not lawfully present in the United States.

If a displacing agency determines by clear and convincing evidence that a determination of the ineligibility of a displaced person under subsection (1) of this section would result in exceptional and extremely unusual hardship to an individual who is the displaced person’s spouse, parent, or child and who is a citizen of the United States or an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States, the displacing agency shall provide relocation payments and other assistance to the displaced person under this chapter if the displaced person would be eligible for the assistance but for subsection (1) of this section.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and in order to comply with federal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 448, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-39-13.
Relocation assistance advisory programs.

Programs or projects undertaken by a displacing agency with public financial assistance shall be planned in a manner that recognizes, at an early stage in the planning of such programs or projects and before the commencement of any actions which will cause displacements, the problems associated with the displacement of individuals, families, businesses and farm operations, and which provides for the resolution of such problems in order to minimize adverse impacts on displaced persons and to expedite program or project advancement and completion.

The head of any displacing agency shall ensure that the relocation assistance advisory services described in subsection (3) of this section are made available to all persons displaced by such agency. If such agency head determines that any person occupying property immediately adjacent to the property where the displacing activity occurs is caused substantial economic injury as a result thereof, the agency head may make advisory services available to such person.

Each relocation assistance advisory program required by subsection (2) of this section shall include such measures, facilities or services as may be necessary or appropriate in order to determine and make timely recommendations on the needs and preferences, if any, of displaced persons for relocation assistance; provide current and continuing information on the availability, sales prices and rental charges of comparable replacement dwellings for displaced homeowners and tenants and suitable locations for businesses and farm operations; assure that a person shall not be required to move from a dwelling unless the person has had a reasonable opportunity to relocate to a comparable replacement dwelling, except in the case of a major disaster as defined in Section 102(2) of the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, a national emergency declared by the President or any other emergency which requires the person to move immediately from the dwelling because continued occupancy of such dwelling by the person constitutes a substantial danger to the health or safety of the person; assist a person displaced from a business or farm operation in obtaining and becoming established in a suitable replacement location; supply information concerning other federal and state programs which may be of assistance to displaced persons; supply technical assistance to such persons in applying for assistance under such programs; and provide other advisory services to displaced persons in order to minimize hardships to such persons in adjusting to relocation.

The head of a displacing agency shall coordinate the relocation activities performed by such agency with other federal, state or local governmental actions in the community which could affect the efficient and effective delivery of relocation assistance and related services.

In any case in which a displacing agency acquires property for a program or project, any person who occupies such property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project shall be eligible for advisory services to the extent determined by the displacing agency.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-76; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 6; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1996).

§ 43-39-15.
Agency to assure availability of suitable dwellings for displaced persons.

Whenever the acquisition of real property for a program or project will result in the displacement of any person on or after July 1, 1972, the displacing agency shall assure that within a reasonable period of time prior to displacement, there will be available comparable, decent, safe and sanitary replacement housing which is within the financial means of such displaced persons. Regulations issued pursuant to Section 43-39-17 may prescribe situations when these assurances may be waived.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-77; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1989).

§ 43-39-16.
Agency to provide replacement dwellings if none available; persons not required to move if replacement dwellings unavailable.

If a program or project undertaken by an agency with public financial assistance cannot proceed on a timely basis because comparable replacement dwellings are not available, and the head of the displacing agency determines that such dwellings cannot otherwise be made available, the head of the displacing agency may take such action as is necessary or appropriate to provide such dwellings by use of funds authorized for such project. The head of the displacing agency may use this section to exceed the maximum amounts which may be paid under Sections 43-39-9 and 43-39-11, on a case-by-case basis for good cause as determined in accordance with such regulations as the head of the agency issues.

No person shall be required to move from his dwelling on account of any program or project undertaken by a displacing agency with public financial assistance unless the head of the displacing agency is satisfied that comparable replacement housing is available to such person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1996).

§ 43-39-17.
Duties and responsibilities of head of lead agency; rules and regulations.

The head of the lead agency shall:

Develop and issue such regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

Ensure that relocation assistance activities under this chapter are coordinated with low-income housing assistance programs or projects by a state agency with federal financial assistance;

Monitor, in coordination with other state agencies, the implementation and enforcement of this chapter; and

Perform such other duties as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The head of the lead agency shall adopt rules and regulations and establish such procedures as he may determine as necessary to assure that:

The payments and assistance authorized by this chapter shall be administered in a manner which is fair and reasonable, and as uniform as practicable;

A displaced person who makes proper application for a payment authorized for such person by this chapter shall be paid promptly after a move or, in hardship cases, be paid in advance; and

Any person aggrieved may have his application reviewed by the state agency having authority over such program or project.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-78; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 8; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1989).

§ 43-39-19.
Agencies may contract for service or work through federal or local organizations.

In order to prevent unnecessary expense and duplication of functions, and to promote uniform and effective administration of relocation assistance programs for displaced persons, the agency may enter into contracts with any individual, firm, association or corporation for services in connection with those programs, or may carry out its functions under this chapter through any federal agency or any department or instrumentality of the state or its political subdivisions having an established organization for conducting relocation assistance programs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-79; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-39-21.
Availability of funds.

Funds appropriated or otherwise available to any agency for the acquisition of real property or any interest therein for a particular program or project shall be available also for obligation and expenditure to carry out the provisions of this chapter as applied to that program or project.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-80; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-39-23.
Relocation payments not to be considered as income or resources.

Except as otherwise provided in the Federal Uniform Relocation Act, no payment received by a displaced person under this chapter shall be considered as income or resources for the purpose of determining the eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under any state law or for the purposes of the state’s personal income tax law, corporation tax law, or other tax law. Except for any law providing low-income housing assistance, payments shall not be considered as income or resources of any recipient of public assistance and the payments shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-81; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 11; Laws, 1989, ch. 421, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1989).

§ 43-39-25.
Appeal from determination as to eligibility.

Any person or business concern aggrieved by the determination of a displacing agency concerning eligibility for relocation payments authorized by this chapter shall have the right of appeal to the court that would have had jurisdiction if the cause were in eminent domain from such decision at any time within twenty (20) days after actual notice to the aggrieved party. The appeal shall be heard the same as provided by law in eminent domain causes. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any aggrieved party from exercising any right or remedy available to him under state law with respect to any action of a state agency in carrying out this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-82; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 12; Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1996).

§ 43-39-27.
Payments as additives to compensation otherwise provided by law.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as creating in any condemnation proceedings brought under the power of eminent domain any element of value or damages not in existence immediately prior to July 1, 1972, but such payments shall be considered only as additives to due compensation otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2749-83; Laws, 1972, ch. 526, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 43-39-29.
Action of ejectment when project in danger of being delayed; authorization; notice requirements.

The displacing agency is authorized, if the program or project is in danger of being delayed, to bring a civil action seeking ejectment as relief in justice court, chancery court, circuit or county court, or special court of eminent domain where the agency is legally entitled to the possession of the property sued for and demanded.

No person previously lawfully occupying real property shall be required to move from a dwelling (assuming a replacement dwelling will be available) or move his business or farm without at least ninety (90) days advance written notice, after initiation of negotiations for the parcel, followed by a final written thirty-day notice to vacate after the displacing agency is legally entitled to possession.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 445, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1996).